extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/tests/germancompounding.aff
# German compounding

# handle special casing of German sharp s

CHECKSHARPS

# compound flags

COMPOUNDBEGIN U
COMPOUNDMIDDLE V
COMPOUNDEND W

# Prefixes are allowed at the beginning of compounds,
# suffixes are allowed at the end of compounds by default:
# (prefix)?(root)+(affix)?
# Affixes with COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG may be inside of compounds.
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG P

# for German fogemorphemes (Fuge-element)
# Hint: ONLYINCOMPOUND is not required everywhere, but the
# checking will be a little faster with it.

ONLYINCOMPOUND X

# forbid uppercase characters at compound word bounds
CHECKCOMPOUNDCASE

# for handling Fuge-elements with dashes (Arbeits-) 
# dash will be a special word

COMPOUNDMIN 1
WORDCHARS -

# compound settings and fogemorpheme for `Arbeit'

SFX A Y 3
SFX A 0 s/UPX .
SFX A 0 s/VPDX .
SFX A 0 0/WXD .

SFX B Y 2
SFX B 0 0/UPX .
SFX B 0 0/VWXDP .

# a suffix for `Computer'

SFX C Y 1
SFX C 0 n/WD .

# for forbid exceptions (*Arbeitsnehmer)

FORBIDDENWORD Z

# dash prefix for compounds with dash (Arbeits-Computer)

PFX - Y 1
PFX - 0 -/P .

# decapitalizing prefix
# circumfix for positioning in compounds

PFX D Y 29
PFX D A a/PX A
PFX D Ä ä/PX Ä
PFX D B b/PX B
PFX D C c/PX C
PFX D D d/PX D
PFX D E e/PX E
PFX D F f/PX F
PFX D G g/PX G
PFX D H h/PX H
PFX D I i/PX I
PFX D J j/PX J
PFX D K k/PX K
PFX D L l/PX L
PFX D M m/PX M
PFX D N n/PX N
PFX D O o/PX O
PFX D Ö ö/PX Ö
PFX D P p/PX P
PFX D Q q/PX Q
PFX D R r/PX R
PFX D S s/PX S
PFX D T t/PX T
PFX D U u/PX U
PFX D Ü ü/PX Ü
PFX D V v/PX V
PFX D W w/PX W
PFX D X x/PX X
PFX D Y y/PX Y
PFX D Z z/PX Z
